lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 9756 Y 2
SFX 9756 lti ola/557 . 350
SFX 9756 ltis olasi/557 . 350

SFX 9757 Y 2
SFX 9757 lti ola/558 . 350
SFX 9757 ltis olasi/558 . 350

SFX 9758 Y 2
SFX 9758 lti ola/559 . 350
SFX 9758 ltis olasi/559 . 350

SFX 9759 Y 2
SFX 9759 lti ola/560 . 350
SFX 9759 ltis olasi/560 . 350

SFX 9760 Y 2
SFX 9760 lti ola/561 . 350
SFX 9760 ltis olasi/561 . 350

SFX 9761 Y 2
SFX 9761 lti ola/562 . 350
SFX 9761 ltis olasi/562 . 350

SFX 9771 Y 1
SFX 9771 lti olie/563 . 350

SFX 9772 Y 1
SFX 9772 ltis olie/564 . 350

SFX 9773 Y 2
SFX 9773 lti olė/565 . 351
SFX 9773 ltis olėsi/565 . 351

SFX 9774 Y 2
SFX 9774 lti olė/566 . 351
SFX 9774 ltis olėsi/566 . 351

SFX 9775 Y 2
SFX 9775 lti olė/567 . 351
SFX 9775 ltis olėsi/567 . 351

SFX 9779 Y 2
SFX 9779 ti ti/544 . 349
SFX 9779 tis tis/544 . 349

SFX 9780 Y 2
SFX 9780 ti ti/545 . 349
SFX 9780 tis tis/545 . 349

SFX 9781 Y 2
SFX 9781 ti ti/546 . 349
SFX 9781 tis tis/546 . 349

SFX 9782 Y 2
SFX 9782 ti ti/547 . 349
SFX 9782 tis tis/547 . 349

SFX 9783 Y 2
SFX 9783 ti ti/548 . 349
SFX 9783 tis tis/548 . 349

SFX 9784 Y 2
SFX 9784 ti ti/549 . 349
SFX 9784 tis tis/549 . 349

SFX 9785 Y 2
SFX 9785 ti ti/550 . 349
SFX 9785 tis tis/550 . 349

SFX 9786 Y 2
SFX 9786 ti ti/551 . 349
SFX 9786 tis tis/551 . 349

SFX 9787 Y 2
SFX 9787 ti ti/552 . 349
SFX 9787 tis tis/552 . 349

SFX 9788 Y 2
SFX 9788 ti ti/553 . 349
SFX 9788 tis tis/553 . 349

SFX 9799 Y 2
SFX 9799 ti džia/554 . 350
SFX 9799 tis džiasi/554 . 350

SFX 9800 Y 2
SFX 9800 ti džia/555 . 350
SFX 9800 tis džiasi/555 . 350

SFX 9801 Y 2
SFX 9801 ti džia/556 . 350
SFX 9801 tis džiasi/556 . 350

SFX 9802 Y 2
SFX 9802 ti džia/557 . 350
SFX 9802 tis džiasi/557 . 350

SFX 9803 Y 2
SFX 9803 ti džia/558 . 350
SFX 9803 tis džiasi/558 . 350

SFX 9804 Y 2
SFX 9804 ti džia/559 . 350
SFX 9804 tis džiasi/559 . 350

SFX 9805 Y 2
SFX 9805 ti džia/560 . 350
SFX 9805 tis džiasi/560 . 350

SFX 9806 Y 2
SFX 9806 ti džia/561 . 350
SFX 9806 tis džiasi/561 . 350

SFX 9807 Y 2
SFX 9807 ti džia/562 . 350
SFX 9807 tis džiasi/562 . 350

SFX 9817 Y 1
SFX 9817 ti die/563 . 350

SFX 9818 Y 1
SFX 9818 tis die/564 . 350

SFX 9819 Y 2
SFX 9819 ti dė/565 . 351
SFX 9819 tis dėsi/565 . 351

SFX 9820 Y 2
SFX 9820 ti dė/566 . 351
SFX 9820 tis dėsi/566 . 351

SFX 9821 Y 2
SFX 9821 ti dė/567 . 351
SFX 9821 tis dėsi/567 . 351

SFX 9825 Y 2
SFX 9825 arti arti/544 . 349
SFX 9825 artis artis/544 . 349

SFX 9826 Y 2
SFX 9826 arti arti/545 . 349
SFX 9826 artis artis/545 . 349

SFX 9827 Y 2
SFX 9827 arti arti/546 . 349
SFX 9827 artis artis/546 . 349

SFX 9828 Y 2
SFX 9828 arti arti/547 . 349
SFX 9828 artis artis/547 . 349

SFX 9829 Y 2
SFX 9829 arti arti/548 . 349
SFX 9829 artis artis/548 . 349

SFX 9830 Y 2
SFX 9830 arti arti/549 . 349
SFX 9830 artis artis/549 . 349

SFX 9831 Y 2
SFX 9831 arti arti/550 . 349
SFX 9831 artis artis/550 . 349

SFX 9832 Y 2
SFX 9832 arti arti/551 . 349
SFX 9832 artis artis/551 . 349

SFX 9833 Y 2
SFX 9833 arti arti/552 . 349
SFX 9833 artis artis/552 . 349

SFX 9834 Y 2
SFX 9834 arti arti/553 . 349
SFX 9834 artis artis/553 . 349

SFX 9845 Y 2
SFX 9845 arti ąra/554 . 350
SFX 9845 artis ąrasi/554 . 350

SFX 9846 Y 2
SFX 9846 arti ąra/555 . 350
SFX 9846 artis ąrasi/555 . 350

SFX 9847 Y 2
SFX 9847 arti ąra/556 . 350
SFX 9847 artis ąrasi/556 . 350

SFX 9848 Y 2
SFX 9848 arti ąra/557 . 350
SFX 9848 artis ąrasi/557 . 350

SFX 9849 Y 2
SFX 9849 arti ąra/558 . 350
SFX 9849 artis ąrasi/558 . 350

SFX 9850 Y 2
SFX 9850 arti ąra/559 . 350
SFX 9850 artis ąrasi/559 . 350

SFX 9851 Y 2
SFX 9851 arti ąra/560 . 350
SFX 9851 artis ąrasi/560 . 350

SFX 9852 Y 2
SFX 9852 arti ąra/561 . 350
SFX 9852 artis ąrasi/561 . 350

SFX 9853 Y 2
SFX 9853 arti ąra/562 . 350
SFX 9853 artis ąrasi/562 . 350

SFX 9863 Y 1
SFX 9863 arti ąrie/563 . 350

SFX 9864 Y 1
SFX 9864 artis ąrie/564 . 350

SFX 9865 Y 2
SFX 9865 arti aro/565 . 351
SFX 9865 artis arosi/565 . 351

SFX 9866 Y 2
SFX 9866 arti aro/566 . 351
SFX 9866 artis arosi/566 . 351

SFX 9867 Y 2
SFX 9867 arti aro/567 . 351
SFX 9867 artis arosi/567 . 351

SFX 9871 Y 2
SFX 9871 irpti irpti/544 . 349
SFX 9871 irptis irptis/544 . 349

SFX 9872 Y 2
SFX 9872 irpti irpti/545 . 349
SFX 9872 irptis irptis/545 . 349

SFX 9873 Y 2
SFX 9873 irpti irpti/546 . 349
SFX 9873 irptis irptis/546 . 349

SFX 9874 Y 2
SFX 9874 irpti irpti/547 . 349
SFX 9874 irptis irptis/547 . 349

SFX 9875 Y 2
SFX 9875 irpti irpti/548 . 349
SFX 9875 irptis irptis/548 . 349

SFX 9876 Y 2
SFX 9876 irpti irpti/549 . 349
SFX 9876 irptis irptis/549 . 349

SFX 9877 Y 2
SFX 9877 irpti irpti/550 . 349
SFX 9877 irptis irptis/550 . 349

SFX 9878 Y 2
SFX 9878 irpti irpti/551 . 349
SFX 9878 irptis irptis/551 . 349

SFX 9879 Y 2
SFX 9879 irpti irpti/552 . 349
SFX 9879 irptis irptis/552 . 349

SFX 9880 Y 2
SFX 9880 irpti irpti/553 . 349
SFX 9880 irptis irptis/553 . 349

SFX 9891 Y 2
SFX 9891 irpti erpa/554 . 350
SFX 9891 irptis erpasi/554 . 350

SFX 9892 Y 2
SFX 9892 irpti erpa/555 . 350
SFX 9892 irptis erpasi/555 . 350

SFX 9893 Y 2
SFX 9893 irpti erpa/556 . 350
SFX 9893 irptis erpasi/556 . 350

SFX 9894 Y 2
SFX 9894 irpti erpa/557 . 350
SFX 9894 irptis erpasi/557 . 350

SFX 9895 Y 2
SFX 9895 irpti erpa/558 . 350
SFX 9895 irptis erpasi/558 . 350

SFX 9896 Y 2
SFX 9896 irpti erpa/559 . 350
SFX 9896 irptis erpasi/559 . 350

SFX 9897 Y 2
SFX 9897 irpti erpa/560 . 350
SFX 9897 irptis erpasi/560 . 350

SFX 9898 Y 2
SFX 9898 irpti erpa/561 . 350
SFX 9898 irptis erpasi/561 . 350

SFX 9899 Y 2
SFX 9899 irpti erpa/562 . 350
SFX 9899 irptis erpasi/562 . 350

SFX 9909 Y 1
SFX 9909 irpti erpie/563 . 350

SFX 9910 Y 1
SFX 9910 irptis erpie/564 . 350

SFX 9911 Y 2
SFX 9911 irpti irpo/565 . 351
SFX 9911 irptis irposi/565 . 351

SFX 9912 Y 2
SFX 9912 irpti irpo/566 . 351
SFX 9912 irptis irposi/566 . 351

SFX 9913 Y 2
SFX 9913 irpti irpo/567 . 351
SFX 9913 irptis irposi/567 . 351

SFX 9917 Y 2
SFX 9917 iti iti/544 . 349
SFX 9917 itis itis/544 . 349

SFX 9918 Y 2
SFX 9918 iti iti/545 . 349
SFX 9918 itis itis/545 . 349

SFX 9919 Y 2
SFX 9919 iti iti/546 . 349
SFX 9919 itis itis/546 . 349

SFX 9920 Y 2
SFX 9920 iti iti/547 . 349
SFX 9920 itis itis/547 . 349

SFX 9921 Y 2
SFX 9921 iti iti/548 . 349
SFX 9921 itis itis/548 . 349

SFX 9922 Y 2
SFX 9922 iti iti/549 . 349
SFX 9922 itis itis/549 . 349

SFX 9923 Y 2
SFX 9923 iti iti/550 . 349
SFX 9923 itis itis/550 . 349

SFX 9924 Y 2
SFX 9924 iti iti/551 . 349
SFX 9924 itis itis/551 . 349

SFX 9925 Y 2
SFX 9925 iti iti/552 . 349
SFX 9925 itis itis/552 . 349

SFX 9926 Y 2
SFX 9926 iti iti/553 . 349
SFX 9926 itis itis/553 . 349

SFX 9937 Y 2
SFX 9937 iti ja/554 . 350
SFX 9937 itis jasi/554 . 350

SFX 9938 Y 2
SFX 9938 iti ja/555 . 350
SFX 9938 itis jasi/555 . 350

SFX 9939 Y 2
SFX 9939 iti ja/556 . 350
SFX 9939 itis jasi/556 . 350

SFX 9940 Y 2
SFX 9940 iti ja/557 . 350
SFX 9940 itis jasi/557 . 350

SFX 9941 Y 2
SFX 9941 iti ja/558 . 350
SFX 9941 itis jasi/558 . 350

SFX 9942 Y 2
SFX 9942 iti ja/559 . 350
SFX 9942 itis jasi/559 . 350

SFX 9943 Y 2
SFX 9943 iti ja/560 . 350
SFX 9943 itis jasi/560 . 350

SFX 9944 Y 2
SFX 9944 iti ja/561 . 350
SFX 9944 itis jasi/561 . 350

SFX 9945 Y 2
SFX 9945 iti ja/562 . 350
SFX 9945 itis jasi/562 . 350

SFX 9955 Y 1
SFX 9955 iti jie/563 . 350

SFX 9956 Y 1
SFX 9956 itis jie/564 . 350

SFX 9957 Y 2
SFX 9957 iti jo/565 . 351
SFX 9957 itis josi/565 . 351

SFX 9958 Y 2
SFX 9958 iti jo/566 . 351
SFX 9958 itis josi/566 . 351

SFX 9959 Y 2
SFX 9959 iti jo/567 . 351
SFX 9959 itis josi/567 . 351

SFX 9963 Y 2
SFX 9963 ulti ulti/544 . 349
SFX 9963 ultis ultis/544 . 349

SFX 9964 Y 2
SFX 9964 ulti ulti/545 . 349
SFX 9964 ultis ultis/545 . 349

SFX 9965 Y 2
SFX 9965 ulti ulti/546 . 349
SFX 9965 ultis ultis/546 . 349

SFX 9966 Y 2
SFX 9966 ulti ulti/547 . 349
SFX 9966 ultis ultis/547 . 349

SFX 9967 Y 2
SFX 9967 ulti ulti/548 . 349
SFX 9967 ultis ultis/548 . 349

SFX 9968 Y 2
SFX 9968 ulti ulti/549 . 349
SFX 9968 ultis ultis/549 . 349

SFX 9969 Y 2
SFX 9969 ulti ulti/550 . 349
SFX 9969 ultis ultis/550 . 349

AF 9733,9734,9753,9773,65521 # 161
AF 9871,9872,9891,9911,65521 # 167
AF 9963,9964,9983,10003,65521 # 171
AF 9779,9780,9799,9819,65521 # 346
AF 9917,9918,9937,9957,65521 # 352
AF 9825,9826,9845,9865,65521 # 442
