lt_LT.dic
apkulti/171	12
apsikirpti/167	14
apsikulti/171	14
atkirpti/167	12
atpulti/161	12
atsikirpti/167	14
benupulti/161	12
bepulti/161	12
gergžti/346	12
guiti/352	12
išgriozti/346	12
išguiti/352	12
iškirpti/167	12
iškulti/171	12
išpulti/161	12
išsikirpti/167	14
išsikulti/171	14
išuiti/352	12
kirpti/167	12
kirptis/167	14
kulti/171	12
kultis/171	14
neapipulti/161	34
neapkirpti/167	34
neapkulti/171	34
neapsikirpti/167	35
neatkirpti/167	34
nebekirpti/167	34
nebekulti/171	34
nebenukulti/171	34
nebenupulti/161	34
nebepapulti/161	34
nebepripulti/161	34
nebepulti/161	34
nebesikirpti/167	35
nebeužguiti/352	34
nebeužpulti/161	34
nebezuiti/352	34
neguiti/352	34
neišguiti/352	34
neiškirpti/167	34
neiškulti/171	34
neišpulti/161	34
nekirpti/167	34
nekulti/171	34
nenukirpti/167	34
nenukulti/171	34
nenupulti/161	34
nenusikirpti/167	35
nepakirpti/167	34
nepapulti/161	34
neparpulti/161	34
neperkarti/442	34
neperkirpti/167	34
neprakirpti/167	34
neprapulti/161	34
neprikirpti/167	34
neprikulti/171	34
nepripulti/161	34
nepulti/161	34
nesikirpti/167	35
nesikulti/171	35
nesipulti/161	35
nesukirpti/167	34
nesukulti/171	34
nesupulti/161	34
nesusikulti/171	35
neuiti/352	34
neužgriozti/346	34
neužguiti/352	34
neužpulti/161	34
neužsipulti/161	35
nezuiti/352	34
neįkirpti/167	34
neįpulti/161	34
nukirpti/167	12
nukulti/171	12
nupulti/161	12
nusikirpti/167	14
pakirpti/167	12
papulti/161	12
parpulti/161	12
pasikirpti/167	14
pasikulti/171	14
perkarti/442	12
perkirpti/167	12
prakirpti/167	12
prapulti/161	12
prikirpti/167	12
prikulti/171	12
pripulti/161	12
prisikulti/171	14
pulti/161	12
pultis/161	14
sugergžti/346	12
sukirpti/167	12
sukulti/171	12
supulti/161	12
susikulti/171	14
tebekirpti/167	12
tebekulti/171	12
tebepulti/161	12
tebezuiti/352	12
teiškirpti/167	12
tekirpti/167	12
teneprapulti/161	34
tenukulti/171	12
teprapulti/161	12
teprikulti/171	12
tepulti/161	12
tezuiti/352	12
uiti/352	12
užgriozti/346	12
užguiti/352	12
užkulti/171	12
užpulti/161	12
užsipulti/161	14
užuiti/352	12
zuiti/352	12
įpulti/161	12
įsikirpti/167	14
švogžti/346	12
